District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.40

Resources in kind.

(a)

Resources in kind are basic necessities, such as food, clothing, or shelter, which an individual obtains without charge or in return for his or her services.

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Home produce of an applicant or recipient, utilized by him or her and his or her household for their own consumption, shall not be considered in determining need and the amount of payment.

(b)

An individual shall not be required to accept an offer of a free home.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 540, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ii), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.40.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ii) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(ii) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(ii) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(ii) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(ii) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).